Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 352 Mining Regulations
352.220.
Electricity in mines and surface installations.

For purposes of this section, “approved” means that a device, apparatus, equipment, machinery, or practice employed in the mining of coal has been approved by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or accepted by a nationally or federally recognized testing laboratory or the Department of Labor Mine Safety and Health Administration; “suitable” means a design, material, or installation that meets the requirements of its intended use or that is accepted by a nationally or federally recognized testing laboratory or the Department of Labor Mine Safety and Health Administration.

The following shall apply to underground installations:

Nonconductive or insulated materials shall be used when trailing cables or high voltage feeder cables are suspended;

Suitable circuit-interrupting devices shall be provided for all power circuits and equipment at the mine;

All power wires and cables shall be properly insulated and protected by proper installation or guarding;

Ground wires for circuits shall have a total cross-sectional area of not less than one-half (1/2) the power conductor;

Extra length or long trailing cables shall be spread out in long open loops or in a figure-eight configuration on a clean, well rock-dusted floor where the cable can be protected against mechanical injury, but cables suspended in long open loops shall be acceptable;

One (1) temporary splice may be made in any trailing cable. No temporary splice shall be made in a trailing cable within twenty-five (25) feet of the machine except cable reel equipment. Splices in trailing cables shall be made in a workmanlike manner and shall be mechanically strong and well insulated. Splices made in cables shall provide continuity of all components;

Three-phase alternating-current circuits used underground shall contain either a direct or derived neutral which shall be grounded through a suitable resistor at the power center, and a grounding circuit, originating at the grounded side of the grounding resistor, shall extend along with the power conductors and serve as a grounding conductor for the frames of all the electrical equipment supplied power from that circuit;

The frames of hand-held electrically driven tools shall be properly grounded or double-insulated by design. The frames of all pumps shall be properly grounded. Hand-held tools and all pumps shall be properly protected by suitable fuses, circuit breakers, or other no less effective devices to provide the minimum overload and shortcircuit protection required by the department;

All underground high-voltage transmission cables shall be installed only in regularly inspected air courses and haulageways, and shall be covered, buried, or placed so as to afford protection against damage, guarded where men regularly work under or pass under them unless they are six and one-half (6-1/2) feet or more above the floor or rail, securely anchored, properly insulated, and guarded at ends, and covered, insulated, or placed to prevent contact with other circuits. Underground high-voltage cables used in resistance grounded systems shall be equipped with metallic shields around each power conductor, with one (1) or more ground conductors having a total cross-sectional area of not less than one-half (1/2) the power conductor, and with an insulated internal conductor not smaller than No. 10 (AWG) or an insulated external conductor not smaller than No. 8 (AWG) for the ground continuity check circuit. All cables shall be suitable for the current and voltage and shall be properly maintained;

Power circuits shall have suitable disconnecting devices and short-circuit protective devices at or near the supply end of the circuit. Suitable disconnecting devices shall be provided at the beginning of all branch circuits;

Underground transformer stations, battery charging stations, substations, rectifiers, and water pumps shall be housed in noncombustible structures or areas or be equipped with a suitable fire-suppression system.

When a noncombustible structure or area is used, these installations shall be:

Ventilated with intake air that is coursed into a return air course or to the surface and that is not used to ventilate working places; or

Ventilated with intake air that is monitored for carbon monoxide or smoke by an atmospheric monitoring system (AMS) installed and operated in a suitable manner. Monitoring of intake air ventilating battery charging stations shall be done with sensors not affected by hydrogen; or

Ventilated with intake air and equipped with sensors to monitor for heat, carbon monoxide, or smoke.

The sensors used for monitoring shall de-energize power to the installation, activate a visual and audible alarm located outside of and on the intake side of the enclosure, and activate doors that will automatically close when any of the following occurs:

The temperature in noncombustible structure reaches one hundred sixty-five (165) degrees Fahrenheit;

The carbon monoxide concentration reaches ten (10) parts per million above the ambient level for the area; or

The optical density of smoke reaches 0.022 per meter.

At least every thirty (30) days, sensors installed to monitor for carbon monoxide shall be calibrated with a known concentration of carbon monoxide and air sufficient to activate the closing door, or each smoke sensor shall be tested to determine that it functions correctly.

When a fire suppression system is used, the installation shall be:

Ventilated with intake air that is coursed into a return air course or to the surface and that is not used to ventilate working places; or

Ventilated with intake air that is monitored for carbon monoxide or smoke by an atmospheric monitoring system installed and operated in a suitable manner.

All monitoring systems used to monitor intake air ventilating battery charging stations under subparagraphs 1. and 4. of this paragraph shall be done with sensors not affected by hydrogen.

This paragraph shall not apply to:

Rectifiers and power centers with transformers that either are dry-type or contain nonflammable liquid, if they are located at or near the section and are moved as the working section advances or retreats;

Submersible pumps;

Permissible pumps, and associated permissible switchgear;

Pumps located on or near the section that are moved as the working section advances or retreats; or

Small portable pumps. Underground stations containing transformers or circuit breakers filled with flammable oil shall be provided with door sills or their equivalent, which will confine the oil if leakage or rupture occurs, and shall be of fireproof construction. Underground transformers purchased after June 16, 1972, shall be air cooled or cooled with nonflammable liquid or inert gas. Portable power centers, portable transformers, and distribution centers which are essentially fireproof are not required to be placed on separate splits of air but shall be stationed in well ventilated places outby the last open crosscuts;

Electrically powered locomotives shall be provided with suitable electrical protective devices;

Suitable firefighting equipment shall be located at strategic points along the belt conveyor, and proper fire extinguishers shall be provided at the transfer points. The commissioner may prescribe any other safety measures for the prevention and combating of mine fires as they pertain to conveyor belts. Only approved flame resistant belting shall be taken into and used inside any mine, and all underground belt conveyors shall be provided with slippage and sequence switches and with start and stop controls at intervals not to exceed one thousand (1,000) feet. The controls shall be properly installed and positioned so as to be readily accessible;

Communication wires and cables shall be adequately insulated and protected by proper installation or guarding;

Telephone wires shall be provided with lightening arresters where the wires enter the mine and at the buildings on the surface;

Insulating mats shall be placed in front of disconnecting devices and all electrical installations where required;

Ground wires in trailing cables shall be tested weekly for open circuit and high resistance;

Power circuits in tipples, buildings, cleaning plants, etc., and all underground electrical circuits shall be deenergized when not in use over a long period;

All underground power circuits and electrical equipment shall be de-energized before work is done on the circuits and equipment except when necessary for troubleshooting or testing. When electrical work or major mechanical work is performed, a suitable disconnect providing visible evidence that the power is disconnected shall be locked open and a tag shall be posted by the individuals performing the work. Locks and tags shall be removed only by the persons who installed them, or if those persons are unavailable, by a person authorized by the operator. Repairs or maintenance shall not be performed on machinery until the power is off and the machinery is blocked against motion, except where machinery motion is necessary to make adjustment;

Where electric circuits cross over or pass under belt conveyors the wiring shall be suitably protected; and

Switch boxes, contactors, controllers, and all other similar devices shall be kept free of significant accumulations of combustible dust.

The following shall apply to trolley wires and trolley feeder wires:

On all haulage roads, landings, and partings where persons are required to regularly work or pass under bare power wires placed less than six and one-half (6-1/2) feet above the top of the rail, suitable protection shall be provided. This protection shall consist of channeling the roof, placing boards along the wires and extending below them, or the use of some other approved device that affords protection;

All machine feed conductors shall be placed on suitable insulators which shall be so placed as to prevent the conductors coming in contact with combustible or conductive materials;

When the machine or feed wires are carried in the same entry as the trolley wire, they shall be placed on the same side as the trolley wire, between the trolley wire and rib, and shall be protected from contact therewith. Positive feed wires crossing places where persons are required to travel shall be safely guarded or protected against persons coming in contact therewith, as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection;

All trolley and positive feed wires shall be placed on opposite sides of track from refuge holes or necks of rooms when so ordered by the department, but wires, when protected as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, may be placed across the necks of rooms. Switches or circuit breakers shall be provided to control the current at the mine and all important sections in the mine;

Where track is used for the return circuit, at least one (1) side shall be bonded to the full length of the trolley wire installation. Cross-bonds shall be installed not to exceed two hundred (200) foot intervals along the track; and

All mine locomotives shall be fused or otherwise protected at the switch or at the nip.

The following shall apply to surface installations:

High-voltage lines shall be at least twenty (20) feet above the ground where there is a possibility of contact by traffic passing underneath;

Electrical circuits, wires, and cables shall be supported on insulators except when cables, which are of a design that can be safely used without insulators, are used;

Lightning arresters shall be installed on all ungrounded, exposed power conductors and telephone wires entering a mine, regardless of voltage. Overload protection and disconnect switches of suitable sizes and ratings approved by the department shall also be provided, except that they shall not be required of telephone wires;

Every metallic building in which electricity is used or connected with any circuit shall be effectively grounded;

All transformer tanks shall be effectively grounded;

Switch boxes, contactors, controllers, and all other similar devices shall be kept free of significant accumulations of combustible dust that create a fire hazard;

Surface transformer stations shall be housed or fenced in when lower than fifteen (15) feet above the earth, and the fences shall be a minimum of six (6) feet in height; and

All surface power circuits and electrical equipment shall be de-energized before work is done on the circuits and equipment except when necessary for troubleshooting or testing. When electrical work or major mechanical work is performed, a suitable disconnect providing visible evidence that the power is disconnected shall be locked open and a tag shall be posted by the individuals performing the work. Locks and tags shall be removed only by persons who installed them or, if those persons are unavailable, by a person authorized by the operator. Repairs or maintenance shall not be performed on machinery until the power is off and the machinery is blocked against motion, except where machinery motion is necessary to make adjustments. When disconnects for stationary low and medium voltage equipment that do not provide visual evidence that the power is disconnected are used, an adequately rated voltage detector shall be used to test each phase conductor or circuit part to verify they are de-energized before any work is performed. When practical, confirmation that the voltage detector is operating satisfactorily shall be made before each test.

Notwithstanding any provisions of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, the department may authorize the construction, maintenance, operation, or conducting of any activity regulated by this section, to be constructed, maintained, operated, or conducted in a different manner than specified in any provision of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, when scientific or engineering information is made available to the department substantially indicating that the different manner would afford equal or greater protection and safety than the manner required in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section; and

The department may prescribe administrative regulations with respect to the aboveground or underground installations in connection with any mine operation when information is made available indicating that regulation is reasonably necessary to prevent injury to, or loss of, life and property.

All electrical work shall be performed by a certified electrician, or an electrical trainee under the direct supervision of a certified electrician, at all underground mines and surface mines operating draglines or highwall miners.

History.

2739-33: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 26; 1954, ch. 227, § 1; 1972, ch. 303, § 20; 1976, ch. 174, § 13; 1994, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 35, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 37, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 94, § 22, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 26, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(8/21/2008). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. One such correction that was overlooked during codification after the 2005 Regular Session of the General Assembly has been made in this section.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.230.
Use of electrical equipment.

For purposes of this section: “approved” means that a device, apparatus, equipment, machinery, or practice employed in the mining of coal has been approved by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or accepted by a nationally or federally recognized testing laboratory or the Department of Labor Mine Safety and Health Administration; “suitable” means a design, material, or installation that meets the requirements of its intended use or that is accepted by a nationally or federally recognized testing laboratory or the Department of Labor Mine Safety and Health Administration.

All electrical equipment and all other electric-driven equipment except intrinsically safe equipment which is taken into or used inby the last open crosscut and in return airways in underground mines shall be permissible. The commissioner or his authorized representative shall reject any modification to mining equipment which would endanger the health or safety of employees.

Headlights shall be properly installed and maintained in a workmanlike manner and working order on all mobile and face equipment at all times the equipment is in operation.

Headlights shall be mounted to provide maximum illumination where it will be most effective and shall be protected from damage by guarding or locations.

At all times when mining equipment is being used, it shall be maintained in safe working order. Electrical equipment and circuits shall be examined and tested in a suitable manner by certified electricians to ensure safe working order.

Combustible materials, grease, lubricants, or flammable liquids shall not be allowed to accumulate where they can create a fire hazard.

All electrical equipment utilized in intake airways outby the last open crosscut shall be maintained in safe operating condition and in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions.

History.

2739-34, 2739-35: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 27; 1972, ch. 303, § 21; 1976, ch. 174, § 14; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch 8, § 24; 1996, ch. 308, § 36, effective April 9, 1996; 1998, ch. 480, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 104, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 37, § 3, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(8/21/2008). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. One such correction that was overlooked during codification after the 2005 Regular Session of the General Assembly has been made in this section.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.232.
Definitions — Safety requirements governing use of electrical face equipment — Examination for methane gas.

For purposes of this section, “approved” means that a device, apparatus, equipment, machinery, or practice employed in the mining of coal has been approved by the commissioner of the Department For Natural Resources or accepted by a nationally or federally recognized testing laboratory or the United States Department of Labor Mine Safety and Health Administration; “suitable” means a design, material, or installation that meets the requirements of its intended use or that is accepted by a nationally or federally recognized testing laboratory or the United States Department of Labor Mine Safety and Health Administration.

No person shall be placed in charge of electrical face equipment in any mine unless he is a qualified person capable of determining the safety of the roof, face, and ribs of the working places and detecting the presence of explosive gas. Operators of electrical face equipment shall undergo an examination to determine their fitness to detect explosive gas and shall have a minimum of forty-five (45) days of actual mining experience before they are permitted to have charge of electric face equipment. Safety committeemen, shotfirers, and others whose duty may require them to make inspections for gas shall undergo and pass an examination or possess a mine foreman’s certificate before using an approved multi-gas detection device underground. The examination shall be given by the mine inspector. Blank forms for the examination shall be furnished by the department. A copy shall be retained on file at the mine office and the original shall be sent to the department fully made out and signed by the applicant and approved by the mine inspector.

No electric face equipment shall be brought inby the last breakthrough next to the working face until the equipment operator has made an inspection for explosive gas using an approved gas detection device or instrument in the place where the equipment is to work unless the inspection is then made by some other competent person authorized and appointed for that purpose by the mine foreman. If any explosive gas in excess of one percent (1%) is found in the place, the electrical equipment shall not be taken in until the gas is removed.

While the electric equipment is operating at the face, an examination for gas shall be made at not more than twenty (20) minute intervals. If methane gas is found in excess of one percent (1%) at any time, the power shall be de-energized from the equipment and left de-energized until the gas is reduced to less than one percent (1%) and the place determined safe by a foreman.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 37, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

352.240.
Explosives and other blasting devices in mines. [Repealed.]

352.241.
Explosives and blasting devices in mines.

Explosives or detonators carried anywhere underground by any person shall be in containers constructed substantially of nonconductive material, maintained in good condition, and kept closed.

When explosives or detonators are transported underground in cars moved by means of a locomotive or rope, or in shuttle cars, they shall be in substantial covered cars or in special substantial covered containers used specifically for transporting detonators or explosives.

The bodies and covers of the cars and containers shall be constructed or lined with nonconductive material.

If explosives and detonators are hauled in the same explosives car or in the same special container, they shall be separated by at least a four (4) inch substantially fastened hardwood partition or the equivalent.

Explosives, detonators, or other explosive items shall not be transported on the same trip with men.

When explosives or detonators are transported in special cars or containers in cars, they shall be hauled in special trips not connected to any other trip. However, this does not prohibit the use of the additional cars as needed to lower a rope trip or to haul supplies including timbers. Materials so transported shall not project above the top of the car. Exposed highly flammable materials such as oil or grease shall not be hauled on the same trip with explosives.

Explosives or detonators shall not be hauled into or out of a mine within five (5) minutes preceding or following a man trip or any other trip.

Explosives and detonators shall be transported underground by belt only under the following conditions:

In the original and unopened case, in special closed cases constructed of nonconductive material, or in suitable individual containers;

Clearance requirements shall be the same as those for transporting men on belts;

Suitable loading and unloading stations shall be provided; and

Stop controls shall be provided at loading and unloading points, and an attendant shall supervise the loading and unloading of explosives and detonators.

Neither explosives nor detonators shall be transported on flight or shaking conveyors, scrapers, mechanical loading machines, locomotives, cutting machines, track drills, or any self-propelled mobile equipment. However, this does not prohibit the transportation of explosives or detonators in special substantial covered containers as used in subsection (2) of this section in shuttle cars or in equipment designed especially to transport explosives or detonators.

When supplies of explosives and detonators for use in one (1) or more sections are stored underground, they shall be kept in section boxes or magazines of substantial construction with no metal exposed on the inside, located at least twenty-five (25) feet from roadways and power wires, and in a reasonably dry, well-rock-dusted location protected from falls of roof. In pitching beds, where it is not possible to comply with the location requirement, the boxes shall be placed in niches cut into the solid coal or rock.

When explosives or detonators are stored in the section, they shall be kept preferably in separate boxes or magazines not less than five (5) feet apart; if kept in the same box or magazine, they shall be separated by at least a four (4) inch substantially fastened hardwood partition or the equivalent. Not more than a forty-eight (48) hour supply of explosives or detonators shall be stored underground in any one (1) section in the boxes or magazines.

Explosives and detonators stored near the working faces shall be in separate closed containers, and shall be in a location out of line of blast not less than fifty (50) feet from the face and fifteen (15) feet from any pipeline, powerline, rail, or conveyor; except that if kept in niches in the rib, the distance from pipeline, powerline, rail, or conveyor shall be at least fifteen (15) feet. Explosives and detonators, when stored, shall be separated by a distance of at least ten (10) feet.

Explosives and detonators shall be kept in their containers until immediately before use at the working faces.

Only nonmetallic tools shall be used for opening wooden explosives containers. Tools or other materials shall not be stored with explosives or detonators.

All explosives used underground in underground mines, except in sinking shafts and slopes from the surface, shall be of the permissible type, specifically designed and manufactured for underground use, and shall be used as follows:

Fired only with electric detonators of proper strength;

Fired with a permissible shot-firing unit of adequate capacity to fire all caps; however, if firing is done from the surface when all men are out of the mine, the firing unit does not need to meet specifications of permissibility;

Where the coal is cut, shots shall not be fired if the blast hole is drilled beyond the limits of the cut;

Boreholes shall be cleaned, and they shall be checked to see that they are placed properly and are of correct depth, in relation to the cut, before being charged;

All blasting charges shall have a burden of at least eighteen (18) inches in all directions if the height of the seam permits;

Boreholes shall be stemmed with at least twenty-four (24) inches of incombustible material, or at least one-half (1/2) of the length of the hole shall be stemmed if the hole is less than four (4) feet in depth unless other permissible stemming devices or methods are used;

Examinations for gas shall be made immediately before firing each shot or group of multiple shots and after blasting is completed;

Shots shall not be fired in any place where methane greater than one percent (1%) can be detected with approved gas detection devices when tested at a point not less than twelve (12) inches from the roof, face, or rib;

Charges exceeding one and one-half (1-1/2) pounds, but not exceeding three (3) pounds, shall be used only if boreholes are six (6) feet or more in depth, the explosives are charged in a continuous train, with no cartridges deliberately deformed or crushed, with all cartridges in contact with each other, and with the end cartridges touching the back of the hole and the stemming respectively. However the three (3) pound limit does not apply to special solid rock work if the mine is evacuated or if approved by the department;

Shots shall be charged and fired by certified shotfirers designated by the mine foreman;

Boreholes shall not be charged while any other work is being done at the face, and the shot or shots shall be fired before any other work is done in the zone of danger from blasting except that which is necessary to safeguard the employees;

Only nonmetallic tamping bars shall be used for charging and tamping boreholes. This does not prohibit the use of a nonmetallic tamping bar with a nonsparking metallic scraper on one (1) end;

The leg wires of electric detonators shall be kept shunted until ready to connect to the firing cable;

Shots shall not be fired from the power of signal circuit while any men are in the mine;

The roof and ribs of working places shall be tested before and after firing each shot or group of multiple shots;

Ample warning shall be given before shots are fired, and care shall be taken to ascertain that all persons are in the clear. Men shall be removed from adjoining working places when there is danger of a shot blowing through;

Mixed types or brands of explosives shall not be charged or fired in any borehole;

Mudcaps (adobes) or other unconfined shots shall not be fired underground in a mine;

Before blasting, the continuity of the blasting circuits shall be tested with a permissible blaster’s galvanometer specifically designed for this purpose;

No instantaneous detonator shall be connected in a circuit containing short-period delay detonators. The first charge in a sequence shall be initiated by a short period delay detonator having a nominal delay period of not less than twenty-five (25) milliseconds;

All short period delay detonators shall be wired in series;

Each primer shall be made with care to insure that the detonator is inserted properly and does not protrude from the wrapping and that the leg wires are secured to the cartridge in a manner so that the detonator will not become dislodged in handling and charging;

In making a primer, a powder punch of nonsparking material shall be used. The hole in the cartridge shall be at least one-half (1/2) inch deeper than the detonator used. Rolling the end of a cartridge to receive a detonator is prohibited;

The primer shall be placed in the borehole first pointing outward and the rest of the charge shall be pushed in a continuous train to the back of the borehole to prevent cuttings from getting between the cartridges; and

Suitable clean-up of loose coal and coal dust with adequate rock-dusting or wetting down at the face of each working place shall be completed prior to charging shot holes.

Blasting cables shall be:

Well insulated and as long as may be necessary to permit the shotfirer to get in a safe place around a corner;

Short-circuited at the battery end until ready to attach to the blasting unit;

Staggered as to length or the ends kept well separated when attached to the detonator leg wires; and

Kept clear of power wires and all other possible sources of active or stray electric current.

Where misfires occur with electric detonators, a waiting period of at least five (5) minutes shall elapse before anyone returns to the shot. After the failure, the blasting cable shall be disconnected from the source of power and the battery ends short-circuited before electric connections are examined.

Explosives shall be removed by firing a separate charge at least two (2) feet away from, and parallel to, the misfired charge or by washing the stemming and the charge from the borehole with water, or by inserting and firing a new primer after the stemming has been washed out.

A very careful search of the working place and, if necessary, of the blasted material after it reaches the surface shall be made after blasting a misfired hole, to recover any undetonated explosive.

The handling of a misfired shot shall be under the direct supervision of the mine foreman or a competent person designated by him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 22; 1976, ch. 174, § 15; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 25; 1980, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 370, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 308, § 37, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 17, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.250.
Magazines for explosives — Location of. [Repealed.]

352.251.
Magazines for storage of explosives — Requirements for construction and operation.

Separate surface magazines shall be provided for the storage of explosives and detonators.

Surface magazines for storing and distributing explosives in amounts exceeding one hundred twenty-five (125) pounds shall be:

Reasonably bulletproof and constructed of incombustible material or covered with fire-resistive material. The roofs of magazines so located that it is impossible to fire bullets directly through the roof from the ground need not be bulletproof, but where it is possible to fire bullets directly through them, roofs shall be made bullet-resistant by material construction, or by ceiling that forms a tray containing not less than a four (4) inch thickness of sand, or by other methods;

Provided with doors constructed of three-eights (3/8) inch steel plate lined with a two (2) inch thickness of wood, or the equivalent;

Provided with dry floors made of wood or other nonsparking material and have no metal exposed inside the magazine;

Provided with suitable warning signs so located that a bullet passing directly through the face of a sign will not strike the magazine;

Provided with properly screened ventilators;

Equipped with no openings except for entrance and ventilation;

Kept locked securely when unattended.

Surface magazines for storing detonators shall be in accordance with other provisions for storing explosives.

The location of magazines shall be not less than two hundred (200) feet from any mine opening, occupied building, or public road. Where compliance with this provision is not practicable, the magazine shall be effectively barricaded. Where practicable, as determined by the mine inspector, future explosives magazines shall be placed in open pits, ravines or other recessed areas.

The supply kept in distribution magazines shall be limited to approximately one (1) day’s requirements, and such supplies of explosives and detonators may be distributed from the same magazine, if separated by at least a four (4) inch substantially fastened hardwood partition or the equivalent.

The area surrounding magazines for not less than twenty-five (25) feet in all directions shall be kept free of rubbish, dry grass, or other materials of a combustible nature.

Only permissible lights, worn or carried, shall be used inside magazines.

Only nonmetallic tools shall be used for opening wooden containers. Extraneous materials shall not be stored in an explosives or detonator magazine.

Smoking, carrying smokers’ articles, or open flame shall be prohibited in or near any magazine.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 23.

352.260.
Shotfirers — Solid blasting.

Any operator of a mine shall designate only certified persons as shotfirers to prepare the cartridge and set off and discharge the shots.

Shotfirers shall at all times be under the direction of a certified mine foreman.

The following conditions apply when shooting coal from the solid:

All licensees engaged in shooting coal from the solid shall submit an application for a permit to the commissioner on a form prescribed by the department.

Before said permit is issued by the commissioner he shall have an investigation conducted of the mine to determine the adequacy of the proposed solid blasting plan in complying with KRS Chapter 351 and this chapter and administrative regulations applicable to blasting coal in an underground mine.

The mine inspector shall have the authority to stop production at the mine by the issuance of a closure order to any operator who fails to obtain a permit when shooting coal from the solid.

When using the method of solid blasting, no more than one (1) face shall be charged or detonated simultaneously.

When shooting coal from the solid, not more than two (2) adjacent openers or cut holes shall be primed with detonators having the same delay period. The nominal delay intervals between the succeeding rows of horizons shall not be less than fifty (50) milliseconds nor more than one hundred (100) milliseconds.

History.

2739-1, 2739-39, 2739-40: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 29; 1972, ch. 303, § 24; 1980, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 370, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 104, § 20, effective July 14, 2000.

352.270.
Storage of oils or similar flammable material.

Buildings used for the storage of oils or similar flammable material shall not be located within one hundred (100) feet of any hoisting or escape shaft or mine opening. Oil, grease or similar flammable material shall not be stored within one hundred (100) feet of any hoisting or escape shaft or mine opening. Oil and grease used in mines shall be taken into the mine from day to day with one (1) day’s supply being the maximum. Oil and grease stored underground shall be kept in closed containers.

History.

2739-53: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 25; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 26.